Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2705YH (1) 91 lh/ko H.F. 660 Section 1. MEDICAID COVERAGE FOR CHILDREN ââ CONGENITAL 1 DENTAL ABNORMALITIES. The department of health and human 2 services shall require coverage for children under the 3 Medicaid program dental wellness plan kids for the treatment 4 of congenital dental abnormalities. For the purposes of this 5 section, âcongenital dental abnormalitiesâ means genetic 6 mouth or dental abnormalities or anomalies that result in 7 problems, dysfunction, or disease of oral tissues and dentition 8 caused by defective genes. âCongenital dental abnormalitiesâ 9 include cleft lip and cleft palate, anodontia and hypodontia, 10 amelogenesis imperfecta and dentinogenesis imperfecta, 11 supernumerary teeth, malocclusion, periodontal disease, and 12 gingival fibromatosis. 13